Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.145

Release of information in performance of official duties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all law enforcement, criminal justice, or other governmental agencies, or hospital; any physician or other practitioner of the healing arts; or any other organization or person having possession or control of any investigative or other information pertaining to any alleged criminal act or victim concerning which a claim for benefits has been filed under this chapter, shall, upon request, make available to and allow the reproduction of any such information by the section of the department administering this chapter or other public employees in their performance of their official duties under this chapter.

No person or organization, public or private, shall incur any legal liability by reason of releasing any such information to the director of labor and industries or the section of the department which administers this chapter or other public employees in the performance of their official duties under this chapter.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 176 s 7.]